Virginia statutes. Title 44. Military and Emergency Laws.
Chapter 3.2. Emergency Services and Disaster Law.
§ 44-146.17.
(Effective until July 1, 2023) Powers and duties of Governor.

The Governor shall be Director of Emergency Management. He shall take such action from time to time as is necessary for the adequate promotion and coordination of state and local emergency services activities relating to the safety and welfare of the Commonwealth in time of disasters.

The Governor shall have, in addition to his powers hereinafter or elsewhere prescribed by law, the following powers and duties:

To proclaim and publish such rules and regulations and to issue such orders as may, in his judgment, be necessary to accomplish the purposes of this chapter including, but not limited to such measures as are in his judgment required to control, restrict, allocate or regulate the use, sale, production and distribution of food, fuel, clothing and other commodities, materials, goods, services and resources under any state or federal emergency services programs.

He may adopt and implement the Commonwealth of Virginia Emergency Operations Plan, which provides for state-level emergency operations in response to any type of disaster or large-scale emergency affecting Virginia and that provides the needed framework within which more detailed emergency plans and procedures can be developed and maintained by state agencies, local governments and other organizations.

He may direct and compel evacuation of all or part of the populace from any stricken or threatened area if this action is deemed necessary for the preservation of life, implement emergency mitigation, preparedness, response or recovery actions; prescribe routes, modes of transportation and destination in connection with evacuation; and control ingress and egress at an emergency area, including the movement of persons within the area and the occupancy of premises therein.

Executive orders, to include those declaring a state of emergency and directing evacuation, shall have the force and effect of law and the violation thereof shall be punishable as a civil penalty of not more than $500 or as a Class 1 misdemeanor in every case where the executive order declares that its violation shall have such force and effect. Where an executive order declares a violation shall be punishable as a civil penalty, such violation shall be charged by summons and may be executed by a law-enforcement officer when such violation is observed by the officer. The summons used by a law-enforcement officer pursuant to this section shall be, in form, the same as the uniform summons for motor vehicle law violations as prescribed pursuant to §

46.2-388

. The proceeds of such civil penalties collected pursuant to this section shall be paid and collected only in lawful money of the United States and paid into the state treasury to the credit of the Literary Fund.

Such executive orders declaring a state of emergency may address exceptional circumstances that exist relating to an order of quarantine or an order of isolation concerning a communicable disease of public health threat that is issued by the State Health Commissioner for an affected area of the Commonwealth pursuant to Article 3.02 (§

32.1-48.05

et seq.) of Chapter 2 of Title 32.1.

No rule, regulation, or order issued under this section shall have any effect beyond 45 days after the date of issuance. Unless the General Assembly takes action on the rule, regulation, or order within the 45 days during which the rule, regulation, or order is effective, the Governor shall thereafter be prohibited from issuing the same or a similar rule, regulation, or order relating to the same emergency;

To appoint a State Coordinator of Emergency Management and authorize the appointment or employment of other personnel as is necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter, and to remove, in his discretion, any and all persons serving hereunder;

To procure supplies and equipment, to institute training and public information programs relative to emergency management and to take other preparatory steps including the partial or full mobilization of emergency management organizations in advance of actual disaster, to insure the furnishing of adequately trained and equipped forces in time of need;

To make such studies and surveys of industries, resources, and facilities in the Commonwealth as may be necessary to ascertain the capabilities of the Commonwealth and to plan for the most efficient emergency use thereof;

On behalf of the Commonwealth to enter into mutual aid arrangements with other states and to coordinate mutual aid plans between political subdivisions of the Commonwealth. After a state of emergency is declared in another state and the Governor receives a written request for assistance from the executive authority of that state, the Governor may authorize the use in the other state of personnel, equipment, supplies, and materials of the Commonwealth, or of a political subdivision, with the consent of the chief executive officer or governing body of the political subdivision;

To delegate any administrative authority vested in him under this chapter, and to provide for the further delegation of any such authority, as needed;

Whenever, in the opinion of the Governor, the safety and welfare of the people of the Commonwealth require the exercise of emergency measures due to a threatened or actual disaster, to declare a state of emergency to exist;

To request a major disaster declaration from the President, thereby certifying the need for federal disaster assistance and ensuring the expenditure of a reasonable amount of funds of the Commonwealth, its local governments, or other agencies for alleviating the damage, loss, hardship, or suffering resulting from the disaster;

To provide incident command system guidelines for state agencies and local emergency response organizations;

Whenever, in the opinion of the Governor or his designee, an employee of a state or local public safety agency responding to a disaster has suffered an extreme personal or family hardship in the affected area, such as the destruction of a personal residence or the existence of living conditions that imperil the health and safety of an immediate family member of the employee, to direct the Comptroller of the Commonwealth to issue warrants not to exceed $2,500 per month, for up to three calendar months, to the employee to assist the employee with the hardship; and

During a disaster caused by a communicable disease of public health threat for which a state of emergency has been declared pursuant to subdivision (7), to establish a program through which the Governor may purchase PPE for private, nongovernmental entities and distribute the PPE to such private, nongovernmental entities. If federal funding is available to establish and fund the program, the Governor, if necessary to comply with any conditions attached to such federal funding, shall be entitled to seek reimbursement for such purchases from the private, nongovernmental entities and may establish and charge fees to recover the cost of administering the program, including the cost of procuring and distributing the PPE. However, if federal funding is not available to establish and fund the program, the Governor shall, prior to making such purchases, receive a contract for payment for purchase from the private nongovernmental entities for the full cost of procuring and distributing the PPE, which shall include any amortized costs of administering the program. Any purchase made by the Governor pursuant to this subdivision shall be exempt from the provisions of the Virginia Public Procurement Act (§

2.2-4300

et seq.), except the Governor shall be encouraged to comply with the provisions of §

2.2-4310

when possible. The Governor shall also provide for competition where practicable and include a written statement regarding the basis for awarding any contract. Prior to implementing such a program, the Department of Emergency Management shall consult with and survey private, nongovernmental entities in order to assess demand for participation in the program as well as the quantity and types of personal protective equipment such entities would like to procure.

As used in this subdivision, “personal protective equipment” or “PPE” means equipment or supplies worn or employed to minimize exposure to hazards that cause serious workplace injuries and illnesses and may include items such as gloves, safety glasses and shoes, earplugs or muffs, hard hats, respirators, coveralls, vests, full body suits, hand sanitizer, plastic shields, or testing for the communicable disease of public health threat.

History.

1973, c. 260; 1974, c. 4; 1975, c. 11; 1981, c. 116; 1990, c. 95; 1997, c. 893; 2000, c. 309; 2004, cc. 773, 1021; 2006, c. 140; 2007, cc. 729, 742; 2008, cc. 121, 157; 2020, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 14, 15, 17, 38; 2022, cc. 803, 805.

This section is effective until July 1, 2023.

For the version of this section effective July 1, 2023, see the next section.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2004, cc. 773 and
1021, cl. 2 provides: “That the Board of Health shall promulgate regulations to implement the provisions of this act to be effective within 280 days of its enactment.”

Acts
2020, c. 1289, Item
§ 3-6.05, as added by Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 552, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2022, provides: “Any civil penalty under
§

44-146.17(1)

shall be prepayable in the amount set by executive order and in accordance with § 16.1- 69.40:2 B of the Code of Virginia. Any civil penalty amount set by executive order shall not be construed or interpreted so as to limit the discretion of any trial judge trying individual cases at the time fixed for trial.”

Acts
2020, c. 1289, Item
§ 4-0.01 g, as amended by Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 552, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2022, provides:

“1. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any public body, including any state, local, regional, or regulatory body, or a governing board as defined in
§

54.1-2345

of the Code of Virginia may meet by electronic communication means without a quorum of the public body or any member of the governing board physically assembled at one location when the Governor has declared a state of emergency in accordance with
§

44-146.17

, provided that (i) the nature of the declared emergency makes it impracticable or unsafe for the public body or governing board to assemble in a single location; (ii) the purpose of meeting is to discuss or transact the business statutorily required or necessary to continue operations of the public body or common interest community association as defined in
§

54.1-2345

of the Code of Virginia and the discharge of its lawful purposes, duties, and responsibilities; (iii) a public body shall make available a recording or transcript of the meeting on its website in accordance with the timeframes established in
§§

2.2-3707

and

2.2-3707.1

of the Code of Virginia; and (iv) the governing board shall distribute minutes of a meeting held pursuant to this subdivision to common interest community association members by the same method used to provide notice of the meeting.

“2. A public body or governing board convening a meeting in accordance with this subdivision shall:

“a) Give notice to the public or common interest community association members using the best available method given the nature of the emergency, which notice shall be given contemporaneously with the notice provided to members of the public body or governing board conducting the meeting;

“b) Make arrangements for public access or common interest community association members access to such meeting through electronic means including, to the extent practicable, videoconferencing technology.
If the means of communication allows, provide the public or common interest community association members with an opportunity to comment; and

“3. Public bodies must otherwise comply with the provisions of
§

2.2-3708.2

of the Code of Virginia. The nature of the emergency, the fact that the meeting was held by electronic communication means, and the type of electronic communication means by which the meeting was held shall be stated in the minutes of the public body or governing board.”

Acts
2020, Sp. Sess. I, c. 13
provides: “§ 1. For the duration of the emergency declared by the Governor pursuant to
§

44-146.17

of the Code of Virginia in response to COVID-19, the Commissioner of Health shall make available to the public on a website maintained by the Department of Health information about confirmed cases of COVID-19 in the Commonwealth, by week and by health district, including (i) the total number of confirmed cases of COVID-19; (ii) the number of confirmed cases by age group and by race and ethnicity; and (iii) the percentage of cases that are known to be associated with a nursing home, assisted living facility, or correctional facility, provided that the release of such information does not violate the provisions of
§

32.1-41

of the Code of Virginia.”

Acts
2021, cc. 1 and
2, effective February 15, 2021, cl. 1 provides:

“§ 1. As used in this act, “eligible health care provider” means any of the following who, due to their education and training, are authorized to administer drugs: (i) any person licensed by a health regulatory board within the Department of Health Professions whose license is in good standing, or was in good standing within the 20 years immediately prior to lapsing; (ii) any emergency medical services provider licensed or certified by the Department of Health (the Department) whose license or certification is in good standing, or was in good standing within the 20 years immediately prior to lapsing; and (iii) any health professions student enrolled in an accredited program in the Commonwealth who is in good academic standing with such student’s school and provided that the school certifies that the student has been properly trained in the administration of vaccines. Eligible health care providers may also be employees of localities, pharmacies, or hospitals. Localities, pharmacies, or hospitals that offer their employees to support vaccination clinics shall (i) verify employee certification or licensure, (ii) document completion of the required training, and (iii) provide a list of qualified and available vaccinators to the Department.

“§ 2. During a state of emergency related to the COVID-19 pandemic declared by the Governor pursuant to
§

44-146.17

of the Code of Virginia, an eligible health care provider participating in the program established pursuant to § 3 of this act may administer the COVID-19 vaccine to citizens of the Commonwealth, in accordance with this act.

“§ 3. The Department shall establish a program to enable eligible health care providers to volunteer to administer the COVID-19 vaccine to residents of the Commonwealth during a state of emergency related to the COVID-19 pandemic declared by the Governor pursuant to
§

44-146.17

of the Code of Virginia. Such program shall include (i) a process by which an eligible health care provider may register to participate in the program and (ii) the training requirements for participating eligible health care providers related to the administration of the COVID-19 vaccine, including training on the intramuscular injection of the COVID-19 vaccine and contraindications and side effects of the COVID-19 vaccine. For the purposes of such program, requirements related to background investigation, training, and orientation for Medical Reserve Corps volunteers shall be waived. To facilitate volunteering, the Department shall place a volunteer link on its website’s home page in the same visible location as the other links, such as ‘GET COVIDWISE,’ to make the process to volunteer as a health care provider easily accessible.

“The Department shall make a list of eligible health care providers who have registered pursuant to this section of the act and complied with requirements for training established by the Department available to each local health department and to hospitals operating community vaccination clinics, and the Department, a local health department, or a hospital operating a community vaccination clinic may request that an eligible health care provider included on such list administer the COVID-19 vaccine at a vaccination clinic operated by or in partnership with the Department, local health department, or hospital. Information included on the list shall not be used for any other purpose and shall not be used after the expiration or revocation of all states of emergency declared by the Governor related to the COVID-19 pandemic.

“§ 4. The Department shall ensure that each site at which COVID-19 vaccinations are provided by eligible health care providers who provide such vaccination in accordance with this act meet the following requirements:

“1. A sufficient number of eligible health care providers whose scope of practice includes administration of vaccines shall be available at each site at which COVID-19 vaccines are administered by eligible health care providers pursuant to this act to ensure appropriate oversight of administration of vaccines by eligible health care providers whose scope of practice does not include administration of vaccines.

“2. A sufficient number of eligible health care providers or other persons who are certified to administer cardiopulmonary resuscitation (CPR) are available at each site at which COVID-19 vaccines are administered by eligible health care providers pursuant to this act; however, a valid certification to perform CPR shall not be required to administer COVID-19 in accordance with this act.

“3. Any person who administers a COVID-19 vaccination in accordance with this act shall collect data, including data related to the race and ethnicity of the person to whom the vaccine is administered, and the person who administers a COVID-19 vaccination or the entity that operates a community vaccination site in accordance with this act shall report such data to the Virginia Immunization Information System established pursuant to
§

32.1-46.01

of the Code of Virginia.

“§ 5. A person who is licensed as a nurse practitioner by the Boards of Medicine and Nursing or licensed as a physician assistant by the Board of Medicine who administers the COVID-19 vaccine pursuant to this act may administer such vaccine without a written or electronic practice agreement.

“A health professions student who administers the COVID-19 vaccine pursuant to this act shall be supervised by any eligible health care provider who holds a license issued by a health regulatory board within the Department of Health Professions, and the supervising health care provider shall not be required to be licensed in the same health profession for which the student is studying.

“§ 6. An eligible health care provider who is a health professions student shall, as part of the registration process established by the Department, provide such information necessary to demonstrate that he is in good academic standing with the accredited program in which he is enrolled and that he has been properly trained in the administration of vaccines as may be required by the Department. Information about a health professions student shall not be disclosed by the institution of higher education at which the health professions student is studying unless the health professions student has consented to such disclosure in accordance with the provisions of the federal Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act of 1974,
20 U.S.C. § 1232g and
§

23.1-405

of the Code of Virginia, as applicable.

“Clinical vaccination experience undertaken by a health professions student pursuant to this act may count toward meeting clinical hour requirements of the educational program in which the student is enrolled, subject to a requirement for written verification of such clinical vaccine experience.

“§ 7. In the absence of gross negligence or willful misconduct, any eligible health care provider or entity overseeing any eligible health care provider who administers the COVID-19 vaccine pursuant to this act shall not be liable for (i) any actual or alleged injury or wrongful death or (ii) any civil cause of action arising from any act or omission arising out of, related to, or alleged to have resulted in the contraction of or exposure to the COVID-19 virus or to have resulted from the administration of the COVID-19 vaccine.”

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 309, in the introductory paragraph, substituted “Management” for “Services” at the end of the first sentence, and “emergency services” for “civilian” near the middle of the second sentence; in subdivision (1), inserted the present second sentence, in the present third sentence, substituted “life, implement emergency mitigation, preparedness, response or recovery actions; prescribe” for “life or other emergency mitigation, response or recovery; prescribe” and inserted “including,” and in the present fourth sentence, inserted “to include those declaring a state of emergency and directing evacuation”; in subdivision (3), substituted “training and public information programs relative to emergency management and to take other preparatory steps including the partial or full mobilization of emergency management organizations” for “training programs and public information programs, and to take all other preparatory steps including the partial or full mobilization of emergency service organizations”; added “as needed” at the end of subdivision (6); deleted “and” at the end of subdivision (7); in subdivision (8), substituted “To request a major disaster declaration from the President, thereby certifying the need for federal disaster assistance and ensuring the expenditure” for “When necessary, to request predisaster federal assistance or the declaration of a major disaster and certify the need for federal disaster assistance and to give assurance of the expenditure” and added “and” at the end thereof; and added subdivision (9).

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendments by cc. 773, effective April 12, 2004, and 1021, effective April 21, 2004, are identical, and inserted the next-to-last paragraph in subdivision (1).

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 140 added subdivision (10) and made related changes.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendments by cc. 729 and 742 are identical, and added the last sentence in subdivision (5).

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendments by cc. 121 and 157 are identical, and deleted “natural or man-made” preceding “disasters” at the end of the introductory paragraph; and deleted “man-made or natural” preceding “disaster” in subdivison (10).

The 2020 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2020 amendments by Sp. Sess. I, cc. 17 and 38, effective March 1, 2021, are identical, and inserted “to” preceding “enter into mutual” in the first sentence in subdivision (5); substituted “to declare” for “he may declare” in subdivision (7); substituted “to direct” for “the Governor may direct” in subdivision (10); added subdivision (11); and made a stylistic change.

Cross references.

As to Virginia Freedom of Information Act rules regarding meetings held through electronic communication means, see §

2.2-3708.2

.

For local authority to supply emergency financial assistance to farmers during declared major disasters, see § 3.2-505.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendments by cc. 803 and 805 are identical, and rewrote the last paragraph of subdivision (1), which read: “Except as to emergency plans issued to prescribe actions to be taken in the event of disasters and emergencies, no rule, regulation, or order issued under this section shall have any effect beyond June 30 next following the next adjournment of the regular session of the General Assembly but the same or a similar rule, regulation, or order may thereafter be issued again if not contrary to law.”

§ 44-146.17.
(Effective July 1, 2023) Powers and duties of Governor.

The Governor shall be Director of Emergency Management. He shall take such action from time to time as is necessary for the adequate promotion and coordination of state and local emergency services activities relating to the safety and welfare of the Commonwealth in time of disasters.

The Governor shall have, in addition to his powers hereinafter or elsewhere prescribed by law, the following powers and duties:

To proclaim and publish such rules and regulations and to issue such orders as may, in his judgment, be necessary to accomplish the purposes of this chapter including, but not limited to such measures as are in his judgment required to control, restrict, allocate or regulate the use, sale, production and distribution of food, fuel, clothing and other commodities, materials, goods, services and resources under any state or federal emergency services programs.

He may adopt and implement the Commonwealth of Virginia Emergency Operations Plan, which provides for state-level emergency operations in response to any type of disaster or large-scale emergency affecting Virginia and that provides the needed framework within which more detailed emergency plans and procedures can be developed and maintained by state agencies, local governments and other organizations.

He may direct and compel evacuation of all or part of the populace from any stricken or threatened area if this action is deemed necessary for the preservation of life, implement emergency mitigation, preparedness, response or recovery actions; prescribe routes, modes of transportation and destination in connection with evacuation; and control ingress and egress at an emergency area, including the movement of persons within the area and the occupancy of premises therein.

Executive orders, to include those declaring a state of emergency and directing evacuation, shall have the force and effect of law and the violation thereof shall be punishable as a Class 1 misdemeanor in every case where the executive order declares that its violation shall have such force and effect.

Such executive orders declaring a state of emergency may address exceptional circumstances that exist relating to an order of quarantine or an order of isolation concerning a communicable disease of public health threat that is issued by the State Health Commissioner for an affected area of the Commonwealth pursuant to Article 3.02 (§

32.1-48.05

et seq.) of Chapter 2 of Title 32.1.

No rule, regulation, or order issued under this section shall have any effect beyond 45 days after the date of issuance. Unless the General Assembly takes action on the rule, regulation, or order within the 45 days during which the rule, regulation, or order is effective, the Governor shall thereafter be prohibited from issuing the same or a similar rule, regulation, or order relating to the same emergency;

To appoint a State Coordinator of Emergency Management and authorize the appointment or employment of other personnel as is necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter, and to remove, in his discretion, any and all persons serving hereunder;

To procure supplies and equipment, to institute training and public information programs relative to emergency management and to take other preparatory steps including the partial or full mobilization of emergency management organizations in advance of actual disaster, to insure the furnishing of adequately trained and equipped forces in time of need;

To make such studies and surveys of industries, resources, and facilities in the Commonwealth as may be necessary to ascertain the capabilities of the Commonwealth and to plan for the most efficient emergency use thereof;

On behalf of the Commonwealth to enter into mutual aid arrangements with other states and to coordinate mutual aid plans between political subdivisions of the Commonwealth. After a state of emergency is declared in another state and the Governor receives a written request for assistance from the executive authority of that state, the Governor may authorize the use in the other state of personnel, equipment, supplies, and materials of the Commonwealth, or of a political subdivision, with the consent of the chief executive officer or governing body of the political subdivision;

To delegate any administrative authority vested in him under this chapter, and to provide for the further delegation of any such authority, as needed;

Whenever, in the opinion of the Governor, the safety and welfare of the people of the Commonwealth require the exercise of emergency measures due to a threatened or actual disaster, to declare a state of emergency to exist;

To request a major disaster declaration from the President, thereby certifying the need for federal disaster assistance and ensuring the expenditure of a reasonable amount of funds of the Commonwealth, its local governments, or other agencies for alleviating the damage, loss, hardship, or suffering resulting from the disaster;

To provide incident command system guidelines for state agencies and local emergency response organizations;

Whenever, in the opinion of the Governor or his designee, an employee of a state or local public safety agency responding to a disaster has suffered an extreme personal or family hardship in the affected area, such as the destruction of a personal residence or the existence of living conditions that imperil the health and safety of an immediate family member of the employee, to direct the Comptroller of the Commonwealth to issue warrants not to exceed $2,500 per month, for up to three calendar months, to the employee to assist the employee with the hardship; and

During a disaster caused by a communicable disease of public health threat for which a state of emergency has been declared pursuant to subdivision (7), to establish a program through which the Governor may purchase PPE for private, nongovernmental entities and distribute the PPE to such private, nongovernmental entities. If federal funding is available to establish and fund the program, the Governor, if necessary to comply with any conditions attached to such federal funding, shall be entitled to seek reimbursement for such purchases from the private, nongovernmental entities and may establish and charge fees to recover the cost of administering the program, including the cost of procuring and distributing the PPE. However, if federal funding is not available to establish and fund the program, the Governor shall, prior to making such purchases, receive a contract for payment for purchase from the private nongovernmental entities for the full cost of procuring and distributing the PPE, which shall include any amortized costs of administering the program. Any purchase made by the Governor pursuant to this subdivision shall be exempt from the provisions of the Virginia Public Procurement Act (§

2.2-4300

et seq.), except the Governor shall be encouraged to comply with the provisions of §

2.2-4310

when possible. The Governor shall also provide for competition where practicable and include a written statement regarding the basis for awarding any contract. Prior to implementing such a program, the Department of Emergency Management shall consult with and survey private, nongovernmental entities in order to assess demand for participation in the program as well as the quantity and types of personal protective equipment such entities would like to procure.

As used in this subdivision, “personal protective equipment” or “PPE” means equipment or supplies worn or employed to minimize exposure to hazards that cause serious workplace injuries and illnesses and may include items such as gloves, safety glasses and shoes, earplugs or muffs, hard hats, respirators, coveralls, vests, full body suits, hand sanitizer, plastic shields, or testing for the communicable disease of public health threat.

History.

1973, c. 260; 1974, c. 4; 1975, c. 11; 1981, c. 116; 1990, c. 95; 1997, c. 893; 2000, c. 309; 2004, cc. 773, 1021; 2006, c. 140; 2007, cc. 729, 742; 2008, cc. 121, 157; 2020, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 14, 15, 17, 38; 2022, cc. 803, 805.

§ 44-146.17:1.
Transmittal to General Assembly of rules, regulations, and orders.

The Governor shall cause copies of any order, rule, or regulation proclaimed and published by him pursuant to §

44-146.17

to be transmitted forthwith to each member of the General Assembly.

History.

1981, c. 160.

§ 44-146.17:1.1.
Certain emergency orders; additional requirements.

In any case in which an order declaring a state of emergency relating to a communicable disease of public health threat, or successive related orders, issued by the Governor pursuant to subdivision (1) of §

44-146.17

includes any measure that closes schools or businesses or restricts the movement of healthy persons within the area to which the order applies for more than seven days, all of the rights, protections, and procedures of Article 3.02 (§

32.1-48.05

et seq.) of Chapter 2 of Title 32.1 shall apply.

History.

2022, c. 785.

§ 44-146.17:2.
Annual statewide drill.

The Governor shall conduct an annual statewide drill on response to a large-scale disaster, including electrical power outages. Such drill shall include the participation of local governments, affected state agencies, public utilities, law-enforcement agencies, and other entities as determined by the Governor.

History.

2004, c. 430; 2019, c. 615.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 615 deleted “but not limited to” preceding “electrical power” and deleted the second and third sentences, which read: “The Governor shall submit a report to the General Assembly on the results of the drill by November 30 of each year. The report shall be delivered to the chairs of the House Committee on Militia, Police and Public Safety and the Senate Committee on General Laws.”